csv2fst/yaml_output/VTA_CNJ_Regular.yaml
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: waabamigoosiweg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: waabamigooyeg
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: waabamigoosiwan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: waabamigooyan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: waabamaasiwindwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: waabamindwaa
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: waabamaasiwind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: waabamind
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: waabamigoosiwaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: waabamigooyaang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: waabamigoosiwang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: waabamigooyang
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigosiwaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: waabamigoyaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigosiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: waabamigoyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigosiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: waabamigoyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: waabamigowaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigosinigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamigonipan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigosigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: waabamigopan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigosiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: waabamigoyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigosiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: waabamigoyangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: waabamisinowagoogoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: waabaminagoogoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: waabamisinowaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: waabaminaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwagwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: waabamagwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: waabamagiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: waabamisiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: waabamiyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: waabamegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: waabamegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: waabamisiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: waabamiyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: waabamisiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: waabamiyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamaasiwadwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: waabamadwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamaasiwadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: waabamadiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: waabamisiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: waabamiyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamisigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: waabamiwaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: waabamigooyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: waabamisinowegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: waabaminegwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaawaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: waabamisiwangidwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: waabamiyangidwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: waabamisinowangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: waabaminangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigosigwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: waabamigowaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigosigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: waabamigopan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamisigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: waabamipan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigoosiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: waabamigooyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: waabamisinowegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: waabaminegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaasigoban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamaapan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: waabamisiwangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: waabamiyangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: waabamisinowangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: waabaminangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: waabamisinokwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: waabamikwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: waabamisinokiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: waabamikiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangidwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: waabamangidwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: waabamangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: waabamangidiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: waabamaasiwangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: waabamangwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: waabamaasiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: waabamangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: waabamigoosiwaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: waabamigooyaambaan
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: waabamigoosiwegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: waabamigooyegiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: waabamigoosiwamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: waabamigooyamban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: waabamaasiwindwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: waabamindwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimaasiwindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabamimindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: waabamaasiwindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: waabamindiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: waabamigoosiwaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: waabamigooyaangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: waabamigoosiwangiban
     waabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: waabamigooyangiban
